West Virginia, session 2026, SB718.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. COURTS AND OFFICERS. §50-1-3. Salaries of magistrates. Notwithstanding any provisions of this code to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2021, the annual salary of a magistrate shall be $60,375, and beginning July 1, 2022, the annual salary of a magistrate shall be $63,250.  Beginning July 1, 2026, the annual salary of a magistrate shall be $70,000.